Source/desktopeditors/dictionaries/uz_Latn_UZ/uz_Latn_UZ.aff
# Birlik,Ko‘plik qo‘shimchasi
SFX A Y 861
SFX A 0 lar/HI .
SFX A 0 larim/HI .
SFX A 0 laring/HI .
SFX A 0 lari/HI .
SFX A 0 larimiz/HI .
SFX A 0 laringiz/HI .
SFX A 0 larlari/HI .
SFX A 0 larman .
SFX A 0 larsan .
SFX A 0 larmiz .
SFX A 0 larsiz .
SFX A 0 larlar .
SFX A 0 larsizlar .
SFX A 0 larmasman .
SFX A 0 larmassan .
SFX A 0 larmas .
SFX A 0 larmasmiz .
SFX A 0 larmassiz .
SFX A 0 larmaslar .
SFX A 0 larmassizlar .
SFX A 0 larmanmi .
SFX A 0 larmisan .
SFX A 0 larmi .
SFX A 0 larmizmi .
SFX A 0 larmisiz .
SFX A 0 larmilar .
SFX A 0 larmisizlar .
SFX A 0 larmasmanmi .
SFX A 0 larmasmisan .
SFX A 0 larmasmi .
SFX A 0 larmasmizmi .
SFX A 0 larmasmisiz .
SFX A 0 larmasmilar .
SFX A 0 larmasmisizlar .
SFX A 0 larmanku .
SFX A 0 larsanku .
SFX A 0 larku .
SFX A 0 larmizku .
SFX A 0 larsizku .
SFX A 0 larlarku .
SFX A 0 larsizlarku .
SFX A 0 larmasmanku .
SFX A 0 larmassanku .
SFX A 0 larmasku .
SFX A 0 larmasmizku .
SFX A 0 larmassizku .
SFX A 0 larmaslarku .
SFX A 0 larmassizlarku .
SFX A 0 larmikanman .
SFX A 0 larmikansan .
SFX A 0 larmikan .
SFX A 0 larmikanmiz .
SFX A 0 larmikansiz .
SFX A 0 larmikanmilar .
SFX A 0 larmikanmisizlar .
SFX A 0 lardirman .
SFX A 0 lardirsan .
SFX A 0 lardir .
SFX A 0 lardirmiz .
SFX A 0 lardirsiz .
SFX A 0 lardirlar .
SFX A 0 lardirsizlar .
SFX A 0 larmasdirman .
SFX A 0 larmasdirsan .
SFX A 0 larmasdir .
SFX A 0 larmasdirmiz .
SFX A 0 larmasdirsiz .
SFX A 0 larmasdirlar .
SFX A 0 larmasdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 lardirmanda .
SFX A 0 lardirsanda .
SFX A 0 lardirda .
SFX A 0 lardirmizda .
SFX A 0 lardirsizda .
SFX A 0 lardirlarda .
SFX A 0 lardirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirmanda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirsanda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirmizda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirsizda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirlarda .
SFX A 0 larmasdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 larmidim .
SFX A 0 larmiding .
SFX A 0 larmidi .
SFX A 0 larmidik .
SFX A 0 larmidingiz .
SFX A 0 larmidilar .
SFX A 0 larmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 larmasmidim .
SFX A 0 larmasmiding .
SFX A 0 larmasmidi .
SFX A 0 larmasmidik .
SFX A 0 larmasmidingiz .
SFX A 0 larmasmidilar .
SFX A 0 larmasmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 larmanda .
SFX A 0 larsanda .
SFX A 0 larda .
SFX A 0 larmizda .
SFX A 0 larsizda .
SFX A 0 larlarda .
SFX A 0 larsizlarda .
SFX A 0 larmasmanda .
SFX A 0 larmassanda .
SFX A 0 larmasda .
SFX A 0 larmasmizda .
SFX A 0 larmassizda .
SFX A 0 larmaslarda .
SFX A 0 larmassizlarda .
SFX A 0 lar-chi .
SFX A 0 yam .
SFX A 0 yamman .
SFX A 0 yamsan .
SFX A 0 yammiz .
SFX A 0 yamsiz .
SFX A 0 yamlar .
SFX A 0 yamsizlar .
SFX A 0 yammasman .
SFX A 0 yammassan .
SFX A 0 yammas .
SFX A 0 yammasmiz .
SFX A 0 yammassiz .
SFX A 0 yammaslar .
SFX A 0 yammassizlar .
SFX A 0 yammanmi .
SFX A 0 yammisan .
SFX A 0 yammi .
SFX A 0 yammizmi .
SFX A 0 yammisiz .
SFX A 0 yammilar .
SFX A 0 yammisizlar .
SFX A 0 yammasmanmi .
SFX A 0 yammasmisan .
SFX A 0 yammasmi .
SFX A 0 yammasmizmi .
SFX A 0 yammasmisiz .
SFX A 0 yammasmilar .
SFX A 0 yammasmisizlar .
SFX A 0 yammanku .
SFX A 0 yamsanku .
SFX A 0 yamku .
SFX A 0 yammizku .
SFX A 0 yamsizku .
SFX A 0 yamlarku .
SFX A 0 yamsizlarku .
SFX A 0 yammasmanku .
SFX A 0 yammassanku .
SFX A 0 yammasku .
SFX A 0 yammasmizku .
SFX A 0 yammassizku .
SFX A 0 yammaslarku .
SFX A 0 yammassizlarku .
SFX A 0 yammikanman .
SFX A 0 yammikansan .
SFX A 0 yammikan .
SFX A 0 yammikanmiz .
SFX A 0 yammikansiz .
SFX A 0 yammikanmilar .
SFX A 0 yammikanmisizlar .
SFX A 0 yamdirman .
SFX A 0 yamdirsan .
SFX A 0 yamdir .
SFX A 0 yamdirmiz .
SFX A 0 yamdirsiz .
SFX A 0 yamdirlar .
SFX A 0 yamdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 yammasdirman .
SFX A 0 yammasdirsan .
SFX A 0 yammasdir .
SFX A 0 yammasdirmiz .
SFX A 0 yammasdirsiz .
SFX A 0 yammasdirlar .
SFX A 0 yammasdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 yamdirmanda .
SFX A 0 yamdirsanda .
SFX A 0 yamdirda .
SFX A 0 yamdirmizda .
SFX A 0 yamdirsizda .
SFX A 0 yamdirlarda .
SFX A 0 yamdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirmanda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirsanda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirmizda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirsizda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirlarda .
SFX A 0 yammasdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 yammidim .
SFX A 0 yammiding .
SFX A 0 yammidi .
SFX A 0 yammidik .
SFX A 0 yammidingiz .
SFX A 0 yammidilar .
SFX A 0 yammidingizlar .
SFX A 0 yammasmidim .
SFX A 0 yammasmiding .
SFX A 0 yammasmidi .
SFX A 0 yammasmidik .
SFX A 0 yammasmidingiz .
SFX A 0 yammasmidilar .
SFX A 0 yammasmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 yammanda .
SFX A 0 yamsanda .
SFX A 0 yamda .
SFX A 0 yammizda .
SFX A 0 yamsizda .
SFX A 0 yamlarda .
SFX A 0 yamsizlarda .
SFX A 0 yammasmanda .
SFX A 0 yammassanda .
SFX A 0 yammasda .
SFX A 0 yammasmizda .
SFX A 0 yammassizda .
SFX A 0 yammaslarda .
SFX A 0 yammassizlarda .
SFX A 0 yam-chi .
SFX A 0 li .
SFX A 0 liman .
SFX A 0 lisan .
SFX A 0 limiz .
SFX A 0 lisiz .
SFX A 0 lilar .
SFX A 0 lisizlar .
SFX A 0 limasman .
SFX A 0 limassan .
SFX A 0 limas .
SFX A 0 limasmiz .
SFX A 0 limassiz .
SFX A 0 limaslar .
SFX A 0 limassizlar .
SFX A 0 limanmi .
SFX A 0 limisan .
SFX A 0 limi .
SFX A 0 limizmi .
SFX A 0 limisiz .
SFX A 0 limilar .
SFX A 0 limisizlar .
SFX A 0 limasmanmi .
SFX A 0 limasmisan .
SFX A 0 limasmi .
SFX A 0 limasmizmi .
SFX A 0 limasmisiz .
SFX A 0 limasmilar .
SFX A 0 limasmisizlar .
SFX A 0 limanku .
SFX A 0 lisanku .
SFX A 0 liku .
SFX A 0 limizku .
SFX A 0 lisizku .
SFX A 0 lilarku .
SFX A 0 lisizlarku .
SFX A 0 limasmanku .
SFX A 0 limassanku .
SFX A 0 limasku .
SFX A 0 limasmizku .
SFX A 0 limassizku .
SFX A 0 limaslarku .
SFX A 0 limassizlarku .
SFX A 0 limikanman .
SFX A 0 limikansan .
SFX A 0 limikan .
SFX A 0 limikanmiz .
SFX A 0 limikansiz .
SFX A 0 limikanmilar .
SFX A 0 limikanmisizlar .
SFX A 0 lidirman .
SFX A 0 lidirsan .
SFX A 0 lidir .
SFX A 0 lidirmiz .
SFX A 0 lidirsiz .
SFX A 0 lidirlar .
SFX A 0 lidirsizlar .
SFX A 0 limasdirman .
SFX A 0 limasdirsan .
SFX A 0 limasdir .
SFX A 0 limasdirmiz .
SFX A 0 limasdirsiz .
SFX A 0 limasdirlar .
SFX A 0 limasdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 lidirmanda .
SFX A 0 lidirsanda .
SFX A 0 lidirda .
SFX A 0 lidirmizda .
SFX A 0 lidirsizda .
SFX A 0 lidirlarda .
SFX A 0 lidirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 limasdirmanda .
SFX A 0 limasdirsanda .
SFX A 0 limasdirda .
SFX A 0 limasdirmizda .
SFX A 0 limasdirsizda .
SFX A 0 limasdirlarda .
SFX A 0 limasdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 limidim .
SFX A 0 limiding .
SFX A 0 limidi .
SFX A 0 limidik .
SFX A 0 limidingiz .
SFX A 0 limidilar .
SFX A 0 limidingizlar .
SFX A 0 limasmidim .
SFX A 0 limasmiding .
SFX A 0 limasmidi .
SFX A 0 limasmidik .
SFX A 0 limasmidingiz .
SFX A 0 limasmidilar .
SFX A 0 limasmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 limanda .
SFX A 0 lisanda .
SFX A 0 lida .
SFX A 0 limizda .
SFX A 0 lisizda .
SFX A 0 lilarda .
SFX A 0 lisizlarda .
SFX A 0 limasmanda .
SFX A 0 limassanda .
SFX A 0 limasda .
SFX A 0 limasmizda .
SFX A 0 limassizda .
SFX A 0 limaslarda .
SFX A 0 limassizlarda .
SFX A 0 li-chi .
SFX A 0 dek .
SFX A 0 dekman .
SFX A 0 deksan .
SFX A 0 dekmiz .
SFX A 0 deksiz .
SFX A 0 deklar .
SFX A 0 deksizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmasman .
SFX A 0 dekmassan .
SFX A 0 dekmas .
SFX A 0 dekmasmiz .
SFX A 0 dekmassiz .
SFX A 0 dekmaslar .
SFX A 0 dekmassizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmanmi .
SFX A 0 dekmisan .
SFX A 0 dekmi .
SFX A 0 dekmizmi .
SFX A 0 dekmisiz .
SFX A 0 dekmilar .
SFX A 0 dekmisizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmasmanmi .
SFX A 0 dekmasmisan .
SFX A 0 dekmasmi .
SFX A 0 dekmasmizmi .
SFX A 0 dekmasmisiz .
SFX A 0 dekmasmilar .
SFX A 0 dekmasmisizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmanku .
SFX A 0 deksanku .
SFX A 0 dekku .
SFX A 0 dekmizku .
SFX A 0 deksizku .
SFX A 0 deklarku .
SFX A 0 deksizlarku .
SFX A 0 dekmasmanku .
SFX A 0 dekmassanku .
SFX A 0 dekmasku .
SFX A 0 dekmasmizku .
SFX A 0 dekmassizku .
SFX A 0 dekmaslarku .
SFX A 0 dekmassizlarku .
SFX A 0 dekmikanman .
SFX A 0 dekmikansan .
SFX A 0 dekmikan .
SFX A 0 dekmikanmiz .
SFX A 0 dekmikansiz .
SFX A 0 dekmikanmilar .
SFX A 0 dekmikanmisizlar .
SFX A 0 dekdirman .
SFX A 0 dekdirsan .
SFX A 0 dekdir .
SFX A 0 dekdirmiz .
SFX A 0 dekdirsiz .
SFX A 0 dekdirlar .
SFX A 0 dekdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirman .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirsan .
SFX A 0 dekmasdir .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirmiz .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirsiz .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirlar .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 dekdirmanda .
SFX A 0 dekdirsanda .
SFX A 0 dekdirda .
SFX A 0 dekdirmizda .
SFX A 0 dekdirsizda .
SFX A 0 dekdirlarda .
SFX A 0 dekdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirmanda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirsanda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirmizda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirsizda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirlarda .
SFX A 0 dekmasdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 dekmidim .
SFX A 0 dekmiding .
SFX A 0 dekmidi .
SFX A 0 dekmidik .
SFX A 0 dekmidingiz .
SFX A 0 dekmidilar .
SFX A 0 dekmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmasmidim .
SFX A 0 dekmasmiding .
SFX A 0 dekmasmidi .
SFX A 0 dekmasmidik .
SFX A 0 dekmasmidingiz .
SFX A 0 dekmasmidilar .
SFX A 0 dekmasmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 dekmanda .
SFX A 0 deksanda .
SFX A 0 dekda .
SFX A 0 dekmizda .
SFX A 0 deksizda .
SFX A 0 deklarda .
SFX A 0 deksizlarda .
SFX A 0 dekmasmanda .
SFX A 0 dekmassanda .
SFX A 0 dekmasda .
SFX A 0 dekmasmizda .
SFX A 0 dekmassizda .
SFX A 0 dekmaslarda .
SFX A 0 dekmassizlarda .
SFX A 0 dek-chi .
SFX A 0 simon .
SFX A 0 simonman .
SFX A 0 simonsan .
SFX A 0 simonmiz .
SFX A 0 simonsiz .
SFX A 0 simonlar .
SFX A 0 simonsizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmasman .
SFX A 0 simonmassan .
SFX A 0 simonmas .
SFX A 0 simonmasmiz .
SFX A 0 simonmassiz .
SFX A 0 simonmaslar .
SFX A 0 simonmassizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmanmi .
SFX A 0 simonmisan .
SFX A 0 simonmi .
SFX A 0 simonmizmi .
SFX A 0 simonmisiz .
SFX A 0 simonmilar .
SFX A 0 simonmisizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmasmanmi .
SFX A 0 simonmasmisan .
SFX A 0 simonmasmi .
SFX A 0 simonmasmizmi .
SFX A 0 simonmasmisiz .
SFX A 0 simonmasmilar .
SFX A 0 simonmasmisizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmanku .
SFX A 0 simonsanku .
SFX A 0 simonku .
SFX A 0 simonmizku .
SFX A 0 simonsizku .
SFX A 0 simonlarku .
SFX A 0 simonsizlarku .
SFX A 0 simonmasmanku .
SFX A 0 simonmassanku .
SFX A 0 simonmasku .
SFX A 0 simonmasmizku .
SFX A 0 simonmassizku .
SFX A 0 simonmaslarku .
SFX A 0 simonmassizlarku .
SFX A 0 simonmikanman .
SFX A 0 simonmikansan .
SFX A 0 simonmikan .
SFX A 0 simonmikanmiz .
SFX A 0 simonmikansiz .
SFX A 0 simonmikanmilar .
SFX A 0 simonmikanmisizlar .
SFX A 0 simondirman .
SFX A 0 simondirsan .
SFX A 0 simondir .
SFX A 0 simondirmiz .
SFX A 0 simondirsiz .
SFX A 0 simondirlar .
SFX A 0 simondirsizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirman .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirsan .
SFX A 0 simonmasdir .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirmiz .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirsiz .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirlar .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirsizlar .
SFX A 0 simondirmanda .
SFX A 0 simondirsanda .
SFX A 0 simondirda .
SFX A 0 simondirmizda .
SFX A 0 simondirsizda .
SFX A 0 simondirlarda .
SFX A 0 simondirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirmanda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirsanda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirmizda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirsizda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirlarda .
SFX A 0 simonmasdirsizlarda .
SFX A 0 simonmidim .
SFX A 0 simonmiding .
SFX A 0 simonmidi .
SFX A 0 simonmidik .
SFX A 0 simonmidingiz .
SFX A 0 simonmidilar .
SFX A 0 simonmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmasmidim .
SFX A 0 simonmasmiding .
SFX A 0 simonmasmidi .
SFX A 0 simonmasmidik .
SFX A 0 simonmasmidingiz .
SFX A 0 simonmasmidilar .
SFX A 0 simonmasmidingizlar .
SFX A 0 simonmanda .
SFX A 0 simonsanda .
SFX A 0 simonda .
SFX A 0 simonmizda .
SFX A 0 simonsizda .
SFX A 0 simonlarda .
SFX A 0 simonsizlarda .
SFX A 0 simonmasmanda .
SFX A 0 simonmassanda .
SFX A 0 simonmasda .
SFX A 0 simonmasmizda .
SFX A 0 simonmassizda .
SFX A 0 simonmaslarda .
SFX A 0 simonmassizlarda .
SFX A 0 simon-chi .
SFX A 0 sifat .
SFX A 0 sifatman .
SFX A 0 sifatsan .
SFX A 0 sifatmiz .
SFX A 0 sifatsiz .
SFX A 0 sifatlar .
SFX A 0 sifatsizlar .
SFX A 0 sifatmasman .
SFX A 0 sifatmassan .
SFX A 0 sifatmas .
SFX A 0 sifatmasmiz .
SFX A 0 sifatmassiz .
SFX A 0 sifatmaslar .
SFX A 0 sifatmassizlar .
SFX A 0 sifatmanmi .
SFX A 0 sifatmisan .
SFX A 0 sifatmi .
SFX A 0 sifatmizmi .
SFX A 0 sifatmisiz .
SFX A 0 sifatmilar .
SFX A 0 sifatmisizlar .
SFX A 0 sifatmasmanmi .
SFX A 0 sifatmasmisan .
SFX A 0 sifatmasmi .
SFX A 0 sifatmasmizmi .
SFX A 0 sifatmasmisiz .
